Ohio, session 136, HB790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 9.51 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 9.51. (A) The general assembly designates the honor and remember flag as the symbol of Ohio's concern and commitment to honoring and remembering the service members of the United States armed forces who have lost their lives while serving or as a result of service, and to honoring and remembering the families of fallen service members. The honor and remember flag's red field represents the blood shed by brave men and women who sacrificed their lives for freedom; the flag's white field and border recognizes the purity of that sacrifice; the flag's blue star is a symbol of active service in military conflict that dates back to World War I; the flag's gold star signifies the ultimate sacrifice of a warrior in active service who is not returning home and reflects the value of the life given; the flag's folded flag element highlights this nation's final tribute to a fallen service member and a family's sacrifice; and the flag's flame symbolizes the eternal spirit of the departed. (B) The general assembly encourages the display of the honor and remember flag during normal business hours at any public building in the state, and at any location during a military memorial service. (C) The honor and remember flag may be displayed at the statehouse in Columbus on the last Monday in May, known as Memorial Day. (D) The statehouse may comply with this section by commencing the display of the flag during normal business hours on a workday before Memorial Day and ending the display during normal business hours on a workday following Memorial Day. (E) When displayed from the same halyard or staff, the honor and remember flag should fly below, and be not larger than, the United States flag. When displayed from adjacent staffs, the United States flag should always be placed to the flag's own right of other flags, per 4 U.S.C. 7(f). When three or more flags are displayed from the same halyard or staff, the honor and remember flag should always be positioned below all others.